Washington statutes.
RCW 2.14.010

Purpose.

(1) The purpose of this chapter is to provide a supplemental retirement benefit to judges who are elected or appointed under chapter 2.04, 2.06, or 2.08 RCW and who are members of the public employees' retirement system for their service as a judge.

(2) This chapter may be known and cited as the judicial retirement account act.

[ 1988 c 109 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1988 c 109: See note following RCW 2.10.030.